Illinois, session 104th, SB26.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Parentage Act of 2015 is amended 5by changing Section 104 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 46/104)7    Sec. 104. Scope of Act; choice of law; other legal rights 8and duties preserved.9    (a) This Act applies to determination of parentage in this 10State. 11    (b) The court shall apply the law of this State, including 12the rules on choice of law, to adjudicate the parent-child 13relationship. The applicable law may does not depend on: 14        (1) the place of birth of the child; or 15        (2) the past or present residence of the child. 16    (c) This Act does not create, enlarge, abrogate, or 17diminish parental rights or duties under other laws of this 18State, including the common law. 19(Source: P.A. 99-85, eff. 1-1-16.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.